Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB751.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "founded report," "school" and "student" in section 6303(a) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 6303. Definitions.(a) General rule.--The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Founded report." A child abuse report involving a perpetrator that is made pursuant to this chapter, if any of the following applies:(1) There has been a judicial adjudication based on a finding that a child who is a subject of the report has been abused and the adjudication involves the same factual 12345678910111213141516171819 circumstances involved in the allegation of child abuse. The judicial adjudication may include any of the following:(i) The entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere.(ii) A finding of guilt to a criminal charge.(iii) A finding of dependency under 42 Pa.C.S. § 6341 (relating to adjudication) if the court has entered a finding that a child who is the subject of the report has been abused.(iv) A finding of delinquency under 42 Pa.C.S. § 6341 if the court has entered a finding that the child who is the subject of the report has been abused by the child who was found to be delinquent.[(2) There has been an acceptance into an accelerated rehabilitative disposition program and the reason for the acceptance involves the same factual circumstances involved in the allegation of child abuse.](3) There has been a consent decree entered in a juvenile proceeding under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to juvenile matters), the decree involves the same factual circumstances involved in the allegation of child abuse and the terms and conditions of the consent decree include an acknowledgment, admission or finding that a child who is the subject of the report has been abused by the child who is alleged to be delinquent.(4) A final protection from abuse order has been granted under section 6108 (relating to relief), when the child who is a subject of the report is one of the individuals protected under the protection from abuse order and:(i) only one individual is charged with the abuse in 20250HB0751PN0775 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the protection from abuse action;(ii) only that individual defends against the charge;(iii) the adjudication involves the same factual circumstances involved in the allegation of child abuse; and(iv) the protection from abuse adjudication finds that the child abuse occurred.* * *"School." A facility providing elementary, secondary or postsecondary educational services. The term includes the following:(1) Any school of a school district.(2) An area [vocational-technical] career and technical school.(3) A joint school.(4) An intermediate unit.(5) A charter school or regional charter school.(6) A cyber charter school.(7) A private school licensed under the act of January 28, 1988 (P.L.24, No.11), known as the Private Academic Schools Act.(8) A private school accredited by an accrediting association approved by the State Board of Education.(9) A nonpublic school.(10) An institution of higher education.(14) A private school licensed under the act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, No.174), known as the Private Licensed Schools Act.(15) The Hiram G. Andrews Center.20250HB0751PN0775 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (16) A private residential rehabilitative institution as defined in section 914.1-A(c) of the Public School Code of 1949.* * *"Student." An individual enrolled in a public or private school, intermediate unit or area [vocational-technical] career and technical school who is under 18 years of age.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0751PN0775 - 4 - 123456789